Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1404.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3301(a) and (a.1) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 3301. Arson and related offenses.(a) Arson endangering persons.--[(1) A person commits a felony of the first degree if he intentionally starts a fire or causes an explosion, or if he aids, counsels, pays or agrees to pay another to cause a fire or explosion, whether on his own property or on that of another, and if:(i) he thereby recklessly places another person in danger of death or bodily injury, including but not limited to a firefighter, police officer or other person actively engaged in fighting the fire; or12345678910111213141516171819 (ii) he commits the act with the purpose of destroying or damaging an inhabited building or occupied structure of another.](1) A person commits the offense of arson endangering persons, which shall be graded as a felony of the first degree, by:(i) r ecklessly placing another person in danger of death or bodily injury, including , but not limited to , a firefighter, police officer or other person actively engaged in fighting the fire as a result of intentionally starting a fire or causing an explosion, or if the person aids, counsels, pays or agrees to pay another to cause a fire or explosion, whether on the person's own property or on that of another; or(ii) purposely destroying or damaging an inhabited building or occupied structure of another as a result of intentionally starting a fire or causing an explosion, or if the person aids, counsels, pays or agrees to pay another to cause a fire or explosion, whether on the person's own property or on that of another.(2) A person who commits arson endangering persons is guilty of murder of the second degree if the fire or explosion causes the death of any person, including but not limited to a firefighter, police officer or other person actively engaged in fighting the fire, and is guilty of murder of the first degree if the fire or explosion causes the death of any person and was set with the purpose of causing the death of another person.(3) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit the ability of the Commonwealth to seek prosecution for 20260SB1404PN1853 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a violation or violations of this subsection as a result of multiple violations occurring from the same criminal episode. (a.1) Aggravated arson.--[(1) A person commits a felony of the first degree if he intentionally starts a fire or causes an explosion, or if he aids, counsels, pays or agrees to pay another to cause a fire or explosion, whether on his own property or on that of another, and if:(i) he thereby attempts to cause, or intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causes bodily injury to another person, including, but not limited to, a firefighter, police officer or other person actively engaged in fighting the fire; or(ii) he commits an offense under this section which is graded as a felony when a person is present inside the property at the time of the offense.](1) A person commits the offense of aggravated arson, which shall be graded as a felony of the first degree, by:(i) attempting to cause or intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causing bodily injury to another person, including, but not limited to, a firefighter, police officer or other person actively engaged in fighting the fire as a result of intentionally starting a fire or causing an explosion, or if the person aids, counsels, pays or agrees to pay another to cause a fire or explosion, whether on the person's own property or on that of another; or(ii) c ommitting an offense under this section which is graded as a felony when a person is present inside the property at the time of the offense as a result of 20260SB1404PN1853 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 intentionally starting a fire or causing an explosion, or if the person aids, counsels, pays or agrees to pay another to cause a fire or explosion, whether on the person's own property or on that of another.(2) A person who commits aggravated arson is guilty of murder of the second degree if the fire or explosion causes the death of any person, including, but not limited to, a firefighter, police officer or other person actively engaged in fighting the fire.( 3) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit the ability of the Commonwealth to seek prosecution for a violation or violations of this subsection as a result of multiple violations occurring from the same criminal episode.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1404PN1853 - 4 - 123456789101112131415